Hawaii statutes.
[§201-105] Legislation and rules. The
department, with the assistance of the office of solid waste management, shall
coordinate the following activities, as necessary, to develop markets for
recycled materials:

(1) The development and introduction of proposed
legislation; and

(2) The development of rules by the appropriate state
agencies.

It is the intent of the legislature that
implementation of the department's recommendations be expedited. [L
1991, c 324, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next